Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5376.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7yy. (1) Beginning with taxes levied after December 31, 2026, real or personal property owned by a person that has no dependent utilizing a public school or receiving publicly funded educational services in this state on a full- or part-time basis at any time during the year inclusive of the December 31 tax day is exempt from school-related property taxes collected under this act. If granted, an exemption under this section applies in whole or in part as follows: (a) A partial exemption equal to 1 of the following: (i) For school-related property taxes levied in 2027, a 40% reduction in taxable value for the tax year. (ii) For school-related property taxes levied in 2028, a 55% reduction in taxable value for the tax year. (iii) For school-related property taxes levied in 2029, a 70% reduction in taxable value for the tax year. (iv) For school-related property taxes levied in 2030, an 85% reduction in taxable value for the tax year. (b) For school-related property taxes levied in 2031 and each year thereafter, a full exemption equal to a 100% reduction in taxable value for the tax year. (2) The exemption described in subsection (1) is subject to all of the following: (a) A local assessor shall assume a property's eligibility for the exemption unless, based on information obtained from the MiDataHub, the assessor determines that an owner of the property does not meet the exemption requirement described in subsection (1). As used in this subdivision, "MiDataHub" means that term as used in section 23g of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1623g. (b) A rebuttable presumption that an exemption under subsection (1) was wrongfully denied may be raised by either of the following documents if the document evidences nonparticipation in publicly funded educational services that contradicts the basis for the denial of the exemption: (i) A copy of a letter of withdrawal of all dependents from publicly funded educational services. (ii) An affidavit of an individual attesting to not having a dependent utilizing publicly funded educational services. (3) The exemption under this section does not apply to property owned by a private entity the ownership of which, including ownership by 1 or more other private entities, is traceable to an individual or couple who hold not less than a plurality interest in the private entity and have 1 or more dependents utilizing a public school or receiving publicly funded educational services in this state on a full- or part-time basis at any time during the year. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Public school" means that term as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5. (b) "Publicly funded educational services" means educational services provided by a public school. Publicly funded educational services includes any schooling or learning activity for K to 12 students in this state that uses taxpayer assistance to fund or assist in the funding of the activity. (c) "School-related property tax" means a millage levied under any of the following: (i) Section 3 of the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.903. (ii) Section 1211 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1211. (iii) Section 1212 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1212. (iv) Section 1364 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1364. (v) The district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.171 to 397.196, for a district library that includes a school district as a participating municipality. As used in this subparagraph, "municipality", "participating", and "school district" mean those terms as defined in section 2 of the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.172. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5377 (request no. H05121'25). (b) House Bill No. 5378 (request no. H05122'25). (c) House Bill No. 5379 (request no. H05195'25).